Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-233.02
Appropriation of water for use in another state; laws governing; rights of appropriators.

Such applications and all rights thereunder shall be governed by the provisions of the Constitution and statutes of Nebraska as now existing or hereafter amended. Appropriators under the provisions of sections 46-233.01 and 46-233.02 shall have no greater rights than those under appropriations for use within the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1953, c. 161, § 2, p. 505.